Washington statutes.
RCW 41.56.950

Retroactive date in collective bargaining agreements allowable, when.

Whenever a collective bargaining agreement between a public employer and a bargaining representative is concluded after the termination date of the previous collective bargaining agreement between the same parties, the effective date of such collective bargaining agreement may be the day after the termination date of the previous collective bargaining agreement and all benefits included in the new collective bargaining agreement including wage increases may accrue beginning with such effective date as established by this section.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 187 s 1.]